District of Columbia statutes.
2-572

Statement of policy.

The public policy of the District is that all persons are entitled to full and complete information regarding the affairs of government and the actions of those who represent them.

Oct. 21, 1968, Pub. L. 90-614, title IV, § 402
as added Mar. 31, 2011, D.C. Law 18-350, § 2, 58 DCR 734

History

This section is referenced in § 2-575.

Section References